Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201466-2107
Sections; applicability.

Sections 66-2101
to 66-2106 do not apply to a natural gas utility owned or operated by a city
or a metropolitan utilities district.

Laws 2012, LB1115, § 7.